Ohio, session 136, HB753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4507.11 be amended and section 4506.091 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4506.091. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles shall conduct in the English language both of the following: (1) Any knowledge test for a person applying for a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit in accordance with section 4506.06 of the Revised Code; (2) Any skills test for a commercial driver's license in accordance with section 4506.09 of the Revised Code. (B) The registrar shall not authorize the use of a translator, translation dictionary, an electronic device, or an interpreter to assist with the administration of any examination except as necessary to comply with the accessibility guidelines of the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 42 U.S.C. 12101, et seq. Sec. 4507.11. (A)(1) Except as provided in section 4507.112 of the Revised Code, the registrar of motor vehicles shall conduct all necessary examinations of applicants for temporary instruction permits, drivers' licenses, motorcycle operators' endorsements, or motor-driven cycle or motor scooter endorsements. The examination shall include a test of the applicant's knowledge of motor vehicle laws, including the laws governing stopping for school buses and use of an electronic wireless communications device while operating a motor vehicle, a test of the applicant's physical fitness to drive, and a test of the applicant's ability to understand highway traffic control devices. The registrar may shall conduct the examination in such a manner that applicants who are illiterate or limited in their knowledge of the English language are tested and by methods that would indicate to the examining officer that the applicant has a reasonable knowledge of motor vehicle laws and understands highway traffic control devices. The registrar shall not authorize the use of a translator, translation dictionary, an electronic device, or an interpreter to assist with the administration of any examination except as necessary to comply with the accessibility guidelines of the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 42 U.S.C. 12101, et seq. (2) An applicant for a driver's license shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle by driving a motor vehicle under the supervision of an examining officer; however, no applicant for a driver's license shall use a low-speed or under-speed vehicle or a mini-truck for the purpose of demonstrating ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control over a vehicle. The demonstration shall consist of a maneuverability test and a road test. The director of public safety shall determine the formats of the tests. (3) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motorcycle by driving a motorcycle under the supervision of an examining officer. However, no applicant for such an endorsement or restricted license shall use a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter for the purpose of demonstrating ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motorcycle. (4) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, an applicant for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter shall give an actual demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter by driving a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter under the supervision of an examining officer. (5) Except as provided in sections 4507.112 and 4507.12 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall designate the highway patrol, any law enforcement body, or any other employee of the department of public safety to supervise and conduct examinations for temporary instruction permits, drivers' licenses, and motorcycle operators' endorsements and shall provide the necessary rules and forms to properly conduct the examinations. A deputy registrar shall forward to the registrar the records of the examinations, together with the application for a temporary instruction permit, driver's license, or motorcycle operator's endorsement. If in the opinion of the registrar the applicant is qualified to operate a motor vehicle, the registrar shall issue the permit, license, or endorsement. (6) The registrar may authorize the highway patrol, other designated law enforcement body, or other designated employee of the department of public safety to issue an examiner's driving permit to an applicant who has passed the required examination, authorizing that applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the registrar is completing an investigation relative to that applicant's qualifications to receive a temporary instruction permit, driver's license, or motorcycle operator's endorsement. The applicant shall keep the examiner's driving permit in the applicant's immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle. The examiner's driving permit is effective until final action and notification has been given by the registrar, but in no event longer than sixty days from its date of issuance. (B)(1) An applicant for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle who presents to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar a form approved by the director of public safety attesting to the applicant's successful completion within the preceding sixty days of a course of basic instruction provided by the motorcycle safety and education program approved by the director pursuant to section 4508.08 of the Revised Code shall not be required to give an actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motorcycle by driving a motorcycle under the supervision of an examining officer, as described in division (A) of this section. An applicant for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter who presents to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar a form approved by the director of public safety attesting to the applicant's successful completion within the preceding sixty days of a course of basic instruction provided by the motorcycle safety and education program approved by the director pursuant to section 4508.08 of the Revised Code shall not be required to give an actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter by driving a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter under the supervision of an examining officer, as described in division (A) of this section. Upon presentation of the form described in division (B)(1) of this section and compliance with all other requirements relating to the issuance of a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant the endorsement or restricted license, as the case may be. (2) A person who has not attained eighteen years of age and presents an application for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license under division (B)(1) of this section also shall comply with the requirements of section 4507.21 of the Revised Code. (C) A person who holds a valid motorcycle endorsement or restricted license that permits only the operation of a motorcycle may operate a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter with that endorsement or restricted license. Section 2. That existing section 4507.11 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.